Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle E. Liabilities and Pledge of Assets.

§ 81-27-5.401.
Borrowing limit.

Except with the prior written approval of the commissioner, a state trust company may not have liabilities outstanding exceeding an amount equal to five (5) times its capital.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-5.402.
Pledge of asset.

A state trust company may not pledge or create a lien on any of its assets except to secure the repayment of money borrowed or as specifically authorized or required by Section 81-27-5.301, or by rules or regulations adopted under this article. An act, deed, conveyance, pledge, or contract in violation of this section is void.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.